Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. In 1990, the legislature adopted chapter 70A.214 RCW with the goal of reducing hazardous waste generation by 50 percent by 1995, emphasizing voluntary waste reduction strategies. The legislature also acknowledged in its findings that some industries would have limited potential to eliminate hazardous waste production. Many entities achieved significant reductions in their generation of hazardous waste through compliance with chapter 70A.214 RCW. The planning requirement has become obsolete and merely administrative, resulting in unnecessary costs for the reporting businesses and the department of ecology. Other environmental tools and programs enacted in the state hazardous waste management act and its related WAC regulations continue to incentivize lower hazardous waste output.Therefore, chapter 70A.214 RCW should be repealed.Sec. 2. RCW 43.21B.110 and 2025 c 327 s 1, 2025 c 319 s 6, 2025 c 316 s 301, 2025 c 314 s 13, 2025 c 311 s 7, and 2025 c 58 s 1008 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70A.15 RCW, local health departments, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the parks and recreation commission, and authorized public entities described in chapter 79.100 RCW:(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to chapter 70A.230 RCW and RCW 18.104.155, 70A.15.3160, 70A.300.090, 70A.20.050, 70A.205.740, 70A.205.280, 70A.205.545, 70A.355.070, 70A.430.070, 70A.500.260, 70A.505.100, 70A.505.110, 70A.530.040, 70A.350.070, 70A.515.060, 70A.245.040, 70A.245.050, 70A.245.070, 70A.245.080, 70A.245.130, 70A.245.140, 70A.65.200, 70A.455.090, 70A.535.180, 70A.550.030, 70A.555.110, 70A.560.020, 70A.208.230, 70A.565.030, 76.04.205, 76.09.170, 77.55.440, 78.44.250, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060, 18.104.130, 43.27A.190, 70A.15.2520, 70A.15.3010, 70A.15.4530, 70A.15.6010, 70A.205.740, 70A.205.280, ((70A.214.140,)) 70A.300.120, 70A.350.070, 70A.245.020, 70A.65.200, 70A.535.180, 70A.505.100, 70A.555.110, 70A.560.020, 70A.208.230, 70A.565.030, 86.16.020, 88.46.070, 90.03.665, 90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, 90.48.240, 90.56.330, and 90.64.040.(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance, modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by the department or any air authority in the exercise of its jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit, a decision to approve or deny a solid waste management plan under RCW 70A.205.055, approval or denial of an application for a beneficial use determination under RCW 70A.205.260, an application for a change under RCW 90.03.383, or a permit to distribute reclaimed water under RCW 90.46.220.(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the granting or denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70A.205 RCW, including appeals by the department as provided in RCW 70A.205.130.(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW 70A.226.090.(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820.(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026 as provided in RCW 90.64.028.(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.(i) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources' appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).(j) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of public lands under RCW 76.06.180.(k) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue, deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under chapter 77.55 RCW, to issue a stop work order, to issue a notice to comply, to issue a civil penalty, or to issue a notice of intent to disapprove applications.(l) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.(m) Decisions of an authorized public entity under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are reviewable by the hearings board under RCW 79.100.120.(n) Decisions of the department of ecology that are appealable under RCW 70A.245.020 to set recycled minimum postconsumer content for products or to temporarily exclude types of products in plastic containers from minimum postconsumer recycled content requirements.(o) Orders by the department of ecology under RCW 70A.455.080.(p) Decisions by the department of ecology under RCW 70A.208.150(5) regarding a proposal by a producer responsibility organization to count materials sent to an alternative recycling facility towards recycling performance targets.(q) Decisions of the department of natural resources under RCW 76.04.205.(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings board:(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW, except where appeals to the pollution control hearings board and appeals to the shorelines hearings board have been consolidated pursuant to RCW 43.21B.340.(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.15.3010, 70A.15.3070, 70A.15.3080, 70A.15.3090, 70A.15.3100, 70A.15.3110, and 90.44.180.(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and 90.44.220.(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or repeal rules.(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.Sec. 3. RCW 70A.15.2280 and 2020 c 20 s 1096 are each amended to read as follows:The department shall prepare recommendations to reduce air emissions for source categories not generally required to have a permit under RCW 70A.15.2260. Such recommendations shall not require any action by the owner or operator of a source ((and shall be consistent with rules adopted under chapter 70A.214 RCW)). The recommendations shall include but not be limited to: Process changes, product substitution, equipment modifications, hazardous substance use reduction, recycling, and energy efficiency.Sec. 4. RCW 70A.218.020 and 2020 c 20 s 1222 are each amended to read as follows:A fee is imposed for the privilege of generating hazardous waste in the state. The annual amount of the fee shall be thirty-five dollars upon every hazardous waste generator doing business in Washington in the current calendar year or any part thereof. This fee shall be collected by the department or its designee. A hazardous waste generator shall be exempt from the fee imposed under this section if the value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, from all business activities of the hazardous waste generator, is less than twelve thousand dollars in the current calendar year. ((The department shall, subject to appropriation, use the funds collected from the fees assessed in this subsection to support the activities of the office of waste reduction as specified in RCW 70A.214.030.)) The fee imposed pursuant to this section is due annually by July 1 of the year following the calendar year for which the fee is imposed.Sec. 5. RCW 70A.218.040 and 2020 c 20 s 1224 are each amended to read as follows:On an annual basis, the department shall adjust the fees provided for in RCW 70A.218.020 ((and 70A.218.030)), including the maximum annual fee, and maximum total fees, by conducting the calculation in subsection (1) of this section and taking the actions set forth in subsection (2) of this section:(1) In November of each year, the fees, annual fee, and maximum total fees imposed in RCW 70A.218.020 ((and 70A.218.030)), or as subsequently adjusted by this section, shall be multiplied by a factor equal to the most current quarterly "price deflator" available, divided by the "price deflator" used in the numerator the previous year. However, the "price deflator" used in the denominator for the first adjustment shall be defined by the second quarter "price deflator" for 1990.(2) Each year by March 1st the fee schedule, as adjusted in subsection (1) of this section will be published. The department will round the published fees to the nearest dollar.Sec. 6. RCW 70A.218.050 and 2020 c 20 s 1225 are each amended to read as follows:In administration of this chapter for the enforcement and collection of the fees due and owing under RCW 70A.218.020 ((and 70A.218.030)), the department may apply RCW 43.17.240.Sec. 7. RCW 70A.218.060 and 2020 c 20 s 1226 are each amended to read as follows:The hazardous waste assistance account is hereby created in the state treasury. The following moneys shall be deposited into the hazardous waste assistance account:(1) Those revenues which are raised by the fees imposed under RCW 70A.218.020 ((and 70A.218.030)); and(2) ((Penalties and surcharges collected under chapter 70A.214 RCW and this chapter; and(3))) Any other moneys appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature. Moneys in the hazardous waste assistance account may be spent only for the purposes of this chapter following legislative appropriation.Sec. 8. RCW 70A.218.070 and 2020 c 20 s 1227 are each amended to read as follows:The department may use funds in the hazardous waste assistance account to provide technical assistance and compliance education assistance to hazardous substance users and waste generators, to provide grants to local governments, and for administration of this chapter.Technical assistance may include the activities authorized under ((chapter 70A.214 RCW and)) RCW 70A.300.290 to encourage hazardous waste reduction and hazardous use reduction and the assistance provided for by RCW 70A.300.140(2).Compliance education may include the activities authorized under RCW 70A.300.140(2) to train local agency officials and to inform hazardous substance users and hazardous waste generators and owners and operators of hazardous waste management facilities of the requirements of chapter 70A.300 RCW and related federal laws and regulations. To the extent practicable, the department shall contract with private businesses to provide compliance education.Grants to local governments shall be used for small quantity generator technical assistance and compliance education components of their moderate risk waste plans as required by RCW 70A.300.350.Sec. 9. RCW 70A.305.180 and 2025 c 424 s 977 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The model toxics control operating account is hereby created in the state treasury.(2) Moneys in the model toxics control operating account must be used only to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following:(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70A.300 RCW;(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70A.205 RCW;(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this chapter;(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;(e) Financial assistance for local programs and plans, including local solid waste financial assistance, in accordance with chapters 70A.405, 70A.205, ((70A.214,)) 70A.224, and 70A.300 RCW;(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness, training, and response activities;(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70A.135 RCW;(j) A public participation program;(k) Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70A.300.260;(l) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use, reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;(m) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);(n) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;(o) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris clean-up activities in fresh or marine waters; and(p) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and solely to continue the policy of previous biennia, forest practices at the department of natural resources.(3) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in model toxics control operating account may be spent only after appropriation by statute.(4) One percent of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation that are not expended at the close of any biennium revert to the model toxics control operating account.(5) The department must adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance.(6) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the model toxics control operating account to the state general fund.Sec. 10. RCW 70A.305.190 and 2025 c 424 s 978 and 2025 c 414 s 8049 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The model toxics control capital account is hereby created in the state treasury.(2) In addition to the funds deposited into the model toxics control capital account required under RCW 82.21.030, the following moneys must be deposited into the model toxics control capital account:(a) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter, except as provided under RCW 70A.305.170(7);(b) Penalties collected or recovered under this chapter; and(c) Any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature.(3) Moneys in the model toxics control capital account must be used for the improvement, rehabilitation, remediation, and cleanup of toxic sites and other capital-related expenditures for programs and activities identified in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Moneys in the model toxics control capital account may be used only for capital projects and activities that carry out the purposes of this chapter and for financial assistance to local governments or other persons to carry out those projects or activities, including but not limited to the following, generally in descending order of priority:(a) Remedial actions, including the following generally in descending order of priority:(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under subsection (5)(a) of this section;(ii) Grants or loans to local governments for remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of properties as provided for under subsection (5)(d) of this section. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions at:(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent document under the federal cleanup law;(iii) Department-conducted remedial actions;(iv) Grants to persons intending to remediate contaminated real property for development of affordable housing;(v) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70A.305.030(2)(e) if:(A) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70A.305.040(4); and(B) The director has found that the funding will achieve both a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, and the prevention or mitigation of unfair economic hardship;(vi) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70A.305.030(2)(e) if:(A) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone designated under RCW 70A.305.150;(B) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70A.305.040(5); and(C) The director has found the funding will achieve a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup commensurate with the scope of the public funding; and meet any additional criteria established in rule by the department; and(vii) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance;(b) Grants, or loans, or contracts to local governments for solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70A.205, ((70A.214,)) 70A.224, 70A.222, 70A.230, and 70A.300 RCW. Funds must be allocated consistent with priorities and matching requirements in the respective chapters;(c) Toxic air pollutant reduction programs, including grants or loans to local governments for woodstoves and diesel;(d) Grants, loans, or contracts to local governments for hazardous waste plans and programs under chapters 70A.405 and 70A.300 RCW, including chemical action plan implementation. Funds must be allocated consistent with priorities and matching requirements in the respective chapters; and(e) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris clean-up activities in fresh or marine waters.(5) The department may establish and administer a program to provide grants and loans to local governments for remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of contaminated properties. To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments under this subsection:(a) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions exceeds $20,000,000. The agreement is subject to the following limitations:(i) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed 10 years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at the facility;(ii) Extended grant agreements may not exceed 50 percent of the total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and(iii) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been entered into to substantially expend the funds;(b) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the agreement;(c) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance with a schedule specified in the agreement;(d) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments; feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter 43.21C RCW;(e) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions related to area-wide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding, the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially liable person;(f) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the following conditions exists:(i) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship imposed by the clean-up liability;(ii) Funding would create new substantial economic development, public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities that would not otherwise occur; or(iii) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70A.305.040(5) that would not otherwise occur; and(g) When pending grant applications under subsection (4)(d) and (e) of this section exceed the amount of funds available, designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for distribution of available funds.(6) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in model toxics control capital account may be spent only after appropriation by statute.(7) The legislature finds that, in 2023, wildfires in Spokane and Pend Oreille counties resulted in a loss of approximately 366 homes as well as secondary buildings. The burning of these structures has resulted in a large toxic debris field containing asbestos, heavy metals, plastics, and fuel which are at risk of leaching into the soil and groundwater. During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, moneys in the model toxics control capital account may be used for financial assistance to local governments for the testing of hazardous materials, removal of debris, and remediation of soil necessary to support the rebuilding of communities impacted by these wildfires.(8) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the model toxics control capital account to the state general fund.Sec. 11. RCW 78.56.100 and 2021 c 65 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In order to receive a waste discharge permit from the department of ecology pursuant to the requirements of chapter 90.48 RCW or in order to operate a metals mining and milling tailing facility, an applicant proposing a metals mining and milling operation regulated under this chapter must meet the following additional requirements:(a) Any tailings facility shall be designed and operated to prevent the release of pollution and must meet the following standards:(i) Operators shall apply all known available and reasonable technology to limit the concentration of potentially toxic materials in the tailings facility to assure the protection of wildlife and human health;(ii) The tailings facility shall have a containment system that includes an engineered liner system, leak detection and leak collection elements, and a seepage collection impoundment to assure that a leak of any regulated substance under chapter 90.48 RCW will be detected before escaping from the containment system. The design and management of the facility must ensure that any leaks from the tailings facility are detected in a manner which allows for remediation pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW. The applicant shall prepare a detailed engineering report setting forth the facility design and construction. The applicant shall submit the report to the department of ecology for its review and approval of a design as determined by the department. Natural conditions, such as depth to groundwater or net rainfall, shall be taken into account in the facility design, but not in lieu of the protection required by the engineered liner system;(iii) The toxicity of mine or mill tailings and the potential for long-term release of regulated substances from mine or mill tailings shall be reduced to the greatest extent practicable through stabilization, removal, or reuse of the substances; and(iv) The closure of the tailings facility shall provide for isolation or containment of potentially toxic materials and shall be designed to prevent future release of regulated substances contained in the impoundment;(b) The applicant must develop a waste rock management plan approved by the department of ecology and the department of natural resources which emphasizes pollution prevention. At a minimum, the plan must contain the following elements:(i) An accurate identification of the acid generating properties of the waste rock;(ii) A strategy for encapsulating potentially toxic material from the environment, when appropriate, in order to prevent the release of heavy metals and acidic drainage; and(iii) A plan for reclaiming and closing waste rock sites which minimizes infiltration of precipitation and runoff into the waste rock and which is designed to prevent future releases of regulated substances contained within the waste rock; and(c) If an interested citizen or citizen group so requests of the department of ecology, the metals mining and milling operator or applicant shall work with the department of ecology and the interested party to make arrangements for citizen observation and verification in the taking of required water samples. While it is the intent of this subsection to provide for citizen observation and verification of water sampling activities, it is not the intent of this subsection to require additional water sampling and analysis on the part of the mining and milling operation or the department. The citizen observation and verification program shall be incorporated into the applicant's, operator's, or department's normal sampling regimen and shall occur at least once every six months. There is no duty of care on the part of the state or its employees to any person who participates in the citizen observation and verification of water sampling under chapter 232, Laws of 1994 and the state and its employees shall be immune from any civil lawsuit based on any injuries to or claims made by any person as a result of that person's participation in such observation and verification of water sampling activities. The metals mining and milling operator or applicant shall not be liable for any injuries to or claims made by any person which result from that person coming onto the property of the metals mining and milling operator or applicant as an observer pursuant to chapter 232, Laws of 1994. The results from these and all other relevant water sampling activities shall be kept on file with the relevant county and shall be available for public inspection during normal working hours((; and(d) An operator or applicant for a metals mining and milling operation must complete a voluntary reduction plan in accordance with RCW 70A.214.110)).(2) Only those tailings facilities constructed after April 1, 1994, must meet the requirement established in subsection (1)(a) of this section. Only those waste rock holdings constructed after April 1, 1994, must meet the requirement established in subsection (1)(b) of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 70A.214.010 (Legislative findings) and 2020 c 20 s 1212, 1990 c 114 s 1, & 1988 c 177 s 1;(2) RCW 70A.214.020 (Definitions) and 2020 c 20 s 1213, 1991 c 319 s 313, 1990 c 114 s 2, & 1988 c 177 s 2;(3) RCW 70A.214.030 (Office of waste reductionâDuties) and 2020 c 20 s 1214, 1998 c 245 s 133, 1990 c 114 s 3, & 1988 c 177 s 3;(4) RCW 70A.214.040 (Waste reduction and hazardous substance use reduction consultation program) and 2020 c 20 s 1215, 1990 c 114 s 5, & 1988 c 177 s 4;(5) RCW 70A.214.050 (Waste reduction techniquesâWorkshops and seminars) and 1988 c 177 s 5;(6) RCW 70A.214.060 (Waste reduction hotlineâDatabase system) and 1988 c 177 s 6;(7) RCW 70A.214.070 (Waste reduction research and development programâContracts) and 2020 c 20 s 1216 & 1988 c 177 s 7;(8) RCW 70A.214.080 (Director's authority) and 1988 c 177 s 8;(9) RCW 70A.214.090 (Waste reduction and recycling program to promote activities by state agenciesâRecycled paper goal) and 2015 c 225 s 107 & 1989 c 431 s 53;(10) RCW 70A.214.100 (Waste reduction and recycling awards program in K-12 public schoolsâEncouraging waste reduction and recycling in private schools) and 2024 c 341 s 205, 2008 c 178 s 1, 1991 c 319 s 114, & 1989 c 431 s 54;(11) RCW 70A.214.110 (Hazardous waste generators and usersâVoluntary reduction plan) and 1991 c 319 s 314 & 1990 c 114 s 6;(12) RCW 70A.214.120 (Voluntary reduction planâExemption) and 2020 c 20 s 1217 & 1990 c 114 s 7;(13) RCW 70A.214.130 (Voluntary reduction plan, executive summary, or progress reportâDepartment review) and 2020 c 20 s 1218, 2005 c 274 s 338, & 1990 c 114 s 8;(14) RCW 70A.214.140 (Appeal of department order or surcharge) and 2020 c 20 s 1219 & 1990 c 114 s 9;(15) RCW 70A.214.150 (Public inspection of plans, summaries, progress reports) and 1990 c 114 s 10;(16) RCW 70A.214.160 (Multimedia permit pilot programâAir, water, hazardous waste management) and 1998 c 245 s 134 & 1994 c 248 s 1; and(17) RCW 70A.218.030 (Voluntary reduction planâFees) and 2020 c 20 s 1223, 1994 c 136 s 3, & 1990 c 114 s 13.--- END ---